Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 9. Educational Assistance.

§ 33-7-401.
Short title.

This article shall be known as the Mississippi National Guard Educational Assistance Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 422, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 334, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 333, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 33-7-403.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the following words shall have the meanings as set forth by this section:

“Mississippi National Guard” means federally recognized units of the Mississippi National Guard.

“Gender” means words importing the masculine gender only shall apply to female as well as male.

“Active member” means a member of a federally recognized unit of the Mississippi National Guard meeting the minimum requirements for satisfactory membership as defined in the Department of the Army and Air Force Regulations.

“Tuition” means actual cost, including any fees and books, not to exceed the highest actual cost charged by any public, accredited institution of higher learning, vocational education school or community or junior college in Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 422, § 2; Laws, 1978, ch. 348, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 334, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 333, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 569, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 327, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 33-7-405.
National Guard members eligible for tuition and room and board assistance.

The Adjutant General is hereby authorized to pay the tuition, room and board for any active member of the Mississippi National Guard who is enrolled or may enroll within the State of Mississippi in an accredited institution of higher learning, vocational education school or junior college. To be eligible for such benefits, the individual, at the time of his initial enrollment, must be a captain, lieutenant, warrant officer, cadet, officer candidate or enlisted member of the Mississippi National Guard, or a member of such guard who is participating in the educational program authorized by this section as of July 1, 1978; be at least seventeen (17) years of age; and be a resident and a qualified elector of the State of Mississippi. To be eligible for the room and board grant, an individual must also be in an officer producing program and be selected to receive the grant by the Adjutant General. The tuition may only be used for undergraduate studies and vocational education courses, whether such coursework is taken on a semester or clock-hour basis. In no event will any individual be eligible for payment of tuition after receipt of an undergraduate degree, whether received through this article or not. No person shall be eligible for a tuition and/or a room and board grant for more than ten (10) years after the date of the first tuition payment for him under this article. The Adjutant General shall set up minimum standards for performance that must be met in order to maintain eligibility for continuing in the program.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 422, § 3; Laws, 1978, ch. 348, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 334, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 333, § 3; Laws, 1985, ch. 317, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 569, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 584, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 33-7-407.
Conditions of eligibility.

In addition to the prerequisites of Section 33-7-405, the following requirements must be met:

The active member must have completed basic training, be a commissioned officer, be a cadet or be an officer candidate.

He must be a member in good standing with the active Mississippi National Guard, as prescribed by regulations promulgated by the Department of the Army, the Department of the Air Force and the Military Department of Mississippi, at the time of application and during the entire semester/quarter for which benefits are received.

The active member must not be eligible for veterans’ educational assistance pursuant to 38 USCS Sections 1601 through 1643 or pursuant to 38 USCS Sections 1651 through 1698.

The active member must not (i) be eligible for educational assistance pursuant to 10 USCS Sections 2131 through 2135, or (ii) have qualified for an enlistment bonus pursuant to 37 USCS 308c within the past six (6) years. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to render ineligible any active member who is eligible for or has received a reenlistment bonus pursuant to 37 USC 308b. The Adjutant General is authorized and empowered, in his discretion, to waive the disqualifications for assistance, or any one of them, established in items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph upon a determination by him that all monies appropriated to fund the National Guard Educational Assistance Law will not be expended to provide benefits for eligible active members and that it would be in the best interests of the Mississippi National Guard to assist other active members who, but for the disqualifications established in this paragraph, would be eligible to receive assistance pursuant to this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 422, § 4; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 334, § 4; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1982, ch. 333, § 4; Laws, 1994, ch. 569, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 33-7-409.
Termination of benefits.

In the event the individual’s service in the Mississippi National Guard is terminated or his service becomes unsatisfactory while receiving the benefits afforded by this program, the benefits will be terminated. After termination for the above causes, an individual will be ineligible for any further benefits under this article. If for any reason an individual is dismissed from any school for academic or disciplinary reasons, he is ineligible for future benefits from this program. The Adjutant General shall be the final authority for making such determinations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 422, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 334, § 5; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 333, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 33-7-411.
Adjutant General to administer program.

The Adjutant General of Mississippi shall be responsible for the establishment of policies, the administration and implementation of the article. He is also the final authority in determining eligible applicants.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 422, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1980, ch. 334, § 6; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 333, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1982.

§ 33-7-413.
Budget; funding.

The Adjutant General of Mississippi will annually submit to the Legislature through the Legislative Budget Office an estimated budget to support the provisions of this article. The Legislature shall fund this article by separate appropriation and the funds shall be subject to audit by the State Auditor of Public Accounts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 422, § 7; Laws, 1978, ch. 348, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 334, § 7; Laws, 1981, ch. 335, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 333, § 7; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 196; Laws, 1994, ch. 569, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1994.